Nebraska, session 109, LB1148.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
Section 1. For purposes of sections 1 to 10 of this act:
(1) Assisted reproduction means a method of causing pregnancy other
than sexual intercourse. The term includes:
(a) Intrauterine or intracervical insemination;
(b) Donation of gametes;
(c) Donation of embryos;
(d) In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and
(e) Intracytoplasmic sperm injection;
(2) Birth includes stillbirth;
(3) Child means an individual of any age whose parentage may be
determined under sections 1 to 10 of this act;
(4) Determination of parentage means establishment of a parent-child
relationship by a judicial or administrative proceeding;
(5) Donor means an individual who provides gametes intended for use
in assisted reproduction, whether or not for consideration. The term does
not include:
(a) A woman who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted
reproduction; or
(b) A person recognized as a parent under sections 1 to 10 of this
act;
(6) Gamete means sperm, egg, or any part of a sperm or egg;
(7) Individual means a natural person of any age;
(8) Parent means an individual whose parent-child relationship is
recognized under sections 1 to 10 of this act or other Nebraska law;
(9) Parentage or parent-child relationship means the legal
relationship between a child and a parent of the child;
(10) Record means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium
or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in
perceivable form;
(11) Sign means, with present intent to authenticate or adopt a
record:
-2-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
(a) To execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or
(b) To attach to or logically associate with the record an
electronic symbol, sound, or process;
(12) Transfer means a procedure for assisted reproduction by which
an embryo or sperm is placed in the body of the woman who will give birth
to the child; and
(13) Woman means a female individual of any age.
Sec. 2. A donor is not a parent of a child conceived by assisted
reproduction.
Sec. 3. (1)(a) An individual who consents to assisted reproduction
by a woman with the intent to be a parent of a child conceived by the
assisted reproduction is a parent of the child.
(b) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section,
such consent must be in a record signed by a woman giving birth to a
child conceived by assisted reproduction and the individual who intends
to be a parent of the child.
(2) Failure to consent in a record as required by subdivision (1)(b)
of this section, before, on, or after birth of the child, does not
preclude the court from finding consent to parentage if:
(a) The woman or the individual proves by clear and convincing
evidence the existence of an express agreement entered into before
conception that the individual and the woman intended they both would be
parents of the child; or
(b) The woman and the individual for the first two years of the
child's life, including any period of temporary absence, resided together
in the same household with the child and both openly held out the child
as the individual's child, unless the individual dies or becomes
incapacitated before the child attains two years of age or the child dies
before the child attains two years of age, in which case the court may
find consent under this subsection to parentage if a party proves by
clear and convincing evidence that the woman and the individual intended
-3-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
to reside together in the same household with the child and both intended
the individual would openly hold out the child as the individual's child,
but the individual was prevented from carrying out that intent by death
or incapacity.
Sec. 4. If a marriage of a woman who gives birth to a child
conceived by assisted reproduction is terminated through divorce or
dissolution, subject to legal separation or separate maintenance,
declared invalid, or annulled before transfer of gametes or embryos to
the woman, a former spouse of the woman is not a parent of the child
unless the former spouse consented in a record that the former spouse
would be a parent of the child if assisted reproduction were to occur
after a divorce, dissolution, annulment, declaration of invalidity, legal
separation, or separate maintenance, and the former spouse did not
withdraw consent under section 5 of this act.
Sec. 5. (1) An individual who consents under section 3 of this act
to assisted reproduction may withdraw consent any time before a transfer
that results in a pregnancy, by giving notice in a record of the
withdrawal of consent to the woman who agreed to give birth to a child
conceived by assisted reproduction and to any clinic or health care
provider facilitating the assisted reproduction. Failure to give notice
to the clinic or health care provider does not affect a determination of
parentage under sections 1 to 10 of this act.
(2) An individual who withdraws consent under subsection (1) of this
section is not a parent of the child under sections 1 to 10 of this act.
Sec. 6. (1) If an individual who intends to be a parent of a child
conceived by assisted reproduction dies during the period between the
transfer of a gamete or embryo and the birth of the child, the
individual's death does not preclude the establishment of the
individual's parentage of the child if the individual otherwise would be
a parent of the child under sections 1 to 10 of this act.
(2) If an individual who consented in a record to assisted
-4-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
reproduction by a woman who agreed to give birth to a child dies before a
transfer of gametes or embryos, the deceased individual is a parent of a
child conceived by the assisted reproduction only if:
(a) Either:
(i) The individual consented in a record that if assisted
reproduction were to occur after the death of the individual, the
individual would be a parent of the child; or
(ii) The individual's intent to be a parent of a child conceived by
assisted reproduction after the individual's death is established by
clear and convincing evidence; and
(b) Either:
(i) The embryo is in utero not later than thirty-six months after
the individual's death; or
(ii) The child is born not later than forty-five months after the
individual's death.
Sec. 7. (1) An individual who is a parent under sections 1 to 10 of
this act or the woman who gave birth to the child may bring a proceeding
to adjudicate parentage. If the court determines the individual is a
parent under sections 1 to 10 of this act, the court shall adjudicate the
individual to be a parent of the child.
(2) In a proceeding to adjudicate an individual's parentage of a
child, if another individual other than the woman who gave birth to the
child is a parent under sections 1 to 10 of this act, the court shall
adjudicate the individual's parentage of the child under section 9 of
this act.
Sec. 8. (1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this
section, an individual who, at the time of a child's birth, is the spouse
of the woman who gave birth to the child by assisted reproduction may not
challenge the individual's parentage of the child unless:
(a) Not later than two years after the birth of the child, the
individual commences a proceeding to adjudicate the individual's
-5-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
parentage of the child; and
(b) The court finds the individual did not consent to the assisted
reproduction, before, on, or after birth of the child, or withdrew
consent under section 5 of this act.
(2) A proceeding to adjudicate a spouse's parentage of a child born
by assisted reproduction may be commenced at any time if the court
determines:
(a) The spouse neither provided a gamete for, nor consented to, the
assisted reproduction;
(b) The spouse and the woman who gave birth to the child have not
cohabited since the probable time of assisted reproduction; and
(c) The spouse never openly held out the child as the spouse's
child.
(3) This section applies to a spouse's dispute of parentage even if
the spouse's marriage is declared invalid after assisted reproduction
occurs.
Sec. 9. (1) In a proceeding to adjudicate competing claims of
parentage of a child by two or more individuals under sections 1 to 10 of
this act, the court shall adjudicate parentage in the best interest of
the child, based on:
(a) The age of the child;
(b) The length of time during which each individual assumed the role
of parent of the child;
(c) The nature of the relationship between the child and each
individual;
(d) The harm to the child if the relationship between the child and
each individual is not recognized;
(e) The basis for each individual's claim to parentage of the child;
and
(f) Other equitable factors arising from the disruption of the
relationship between the child and each individual or the likelihood of
-6-

LB1148 LB1148
2026 2026
other harm to the child.
(2) If an individual challenges parentage based on the results of
genetic testing, in addition to the factors listed in subsection (1) of
this section, the court shall consider:
(a) The facts surrounding the discovery that the individual might
not be a genetic parent of the child; and
(b) The length of time between the time that the individual was
placed on notice that the individual might not be a genetic parent and
the commencement of the proceeding.
(3) A court shall not adjudicate a child to have more than two
parents.
Sec. 10. (1) Sections 1 to 9 of this act do not apply to the birth
of a child conceived by sexual intercourse.
(2) Nothing in sections 1 to 9 of this act applies to or provides
for recognition of a surrogacy agreement.
(3) Sections 1 to 9 of this act do not apply to the extent otherwise
provided for in the Nebraska Indian Child Welfare Act.
-7-